Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.577

Information from automatic number identification, automatic location identification database, or voluntarily submitted for inclusion in emergency notification system—Exemption from public inspection and copying.

Information obtained from an automatic number identification or automatic location identification database or voluntarily submitted to a local agency for inclusion in an emergency notification system is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW. This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit:

(1) Making outgoing calls to telephone numbers to provide notification of a community emergency event;

(2) Maintenance of the database by a local agency; or

(3) Inspection or copying by the subject of the information or an authorized representative.

[ 2015 c 224 s 7.]